Washington statutes.
RCW 43.168.055

Application priorities.

In addition to the requirements of RCW 43.168.050, the department shall, subject to applicable federal funding criteria, give priority to applications that capitalize or recapitalize an existing or new local revolving fund based on criteria established by the department.

[ 1999 c 164 s 503.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings and subheadings not law—Effective date—Severability—1999 c 164: See notes following RCW 43.160.010.